Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB21.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Agency" means the law enforcement agency primarily responsible for traffic
control at a particular intersection or that law enforcement agency's designee;
(2) "Owner" means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a lessee of a motor
vehicle under a lease of six (6) months or more, but shall not include a motor
vehicle rental or leasing company or holder of a motor vehicle dealer plate issued
under KRS 186.053;
(3) "Recorded images" means images recorded by a traffic control signal monitoring
system:
(a) On two (2) or more photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images,
or on videotape or any other medium; and
(b) Showing the rear of a motor vehicle, and on at least one (1) image or
portion of tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the
motor vehicle; and
(4) "Traffic control signal monitoring system" means a device with one (1) or more
vehicle sensors working in conjunction with a traffic control signal to produce
recorded images of a motor vehicle entering an intersection against a red signal
indication.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Unless the operator of a motor vehicle received a citation from a police officer at
the time of the violation, the operator of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil
penalty of fifty dollars ($50) if the motor vehicle is recorded by a traffic control
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
signal monitoring system while being in violation of subsection (2) of Section 5 of
this Act.
(2) Forty-five dollars ($45) of the revenue generated from a civil penalty for traffic
control signal monitoring system violations shall be retained by the local
government and five dollars ($5) shall be sent to the Administrative Office of the
Courts.
(3) To carry out the purposes of this section, the Administrative Office of the Courts,
in consultation with the Transportation Cabinet, shall prescribe a uniform civil
citation form, which shall include:
(a) The name and address of the registered owner of the motor vehicle;
(b) The name and address of the operator of the motor vehicle, if different from
the owner;
(c) The violation charged;
(d) The date and time of the violation;
(e) The location of the intersection;
(f) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which the civil
penalty should be paid;
(g) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this section as to
the manner and time in which the citation may be contested in District
Court; and
(h) A warning that failure to pay the civil penalty imposed or to contest the
matter in a timely manner is an admission of liability and shall result in the
suspension of the registration of the motor vehicle.
(4) An agency shall mail to the owner of a motor vehicle liable under subsection (1)
of this section, or other person identified as operating the motor vehicle:
(a) A uniform civil citation as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) A copy of the recorded image; and
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
(c) A signed, sworn statement by a technician employed by the agency that,
based on inspection of recorded images, the motor vehicle was being
operated in violation of subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act. This
statement may be admissible in any proceeding alleging a violation under
this section.
(5) An agency may mail a warning notice instead of a citation to the owner of a
motor vehicle liable under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Except as provided for in subsection (2) of Section 3 of this Act, a citation shall
be mailed no later than fourteen (14) days after the alleged violation.
(7) A person who receives a citation under this section may:
(a) Pay the civil penalty in accordance with the instructions on the citation
directly to the District Court; or
(b) Elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The court may consider in defense of a violation under Section 2 of this Act, that:
(a) The operator of the motor vehicle passed through the intersection in
violation of subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act in order to yield right-of-
way to an emergency vehicle, at the direction of a peace officer, or as part of
a funeral procession;
(b) The motor vehicle or the motor vehicle registration plates were stolen before
the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the
owner at the time of the violation;
(c) Section 2 of this Act is not enforceable because at the time and place of the
violation, the traffic control signal was not in the proper position or
discernible enough to be seen by an ordinarily observant individual; and
(d) The person named in the citation was not operating the motor vehicle at the
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
time of the violation. A person named in a citation who uses this defense
shall identify who was operating the motor vehicle at the time of the
violation, including, at a minimum, the operator's name and address.
(2) If the District Court finds that the person named in the citation was not operating
the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the clerk of the District Court shall
provide to the agency issuing the citation a copy of any evidence substantiating
who was operating the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. Upon receipt of
substantiating evidence from the District Court, the agency may issue a citation
under Section 2 of this Act to the person the evidence indicates was operating the
motor vehicle at the time of the violation. The agency shall issue the citation
within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the evidence from the District Court.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a person refuses to pay the civil penalty imposed under Section 2 of this Act
and does not contest the violation, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend the
registration of the motor vehicle, when notified by the District Court, until the
civil penalty is paid.
(2) A violation under Section 2 of this Act shall not result in points assessed against
the driving record of the operator of the motor vehicle in violation.
Section 5. KRS 189.231 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of transportation may install and maintain traffic control devices upon
state-maintained highways in such manner as is reasonably necessary to promote
the safety and convenience of the traveling public.
(2) The driver of any vehicle shall obey the instructions of any official traffic control
device applicable thereto unless otherwise directed by a traffic or police officer,
subject to the exceptions granted the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle.
(3) The secretary of transportation may restrict or regulate traffic upon state-maintained
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
highways in such a manner as is reasonably necessary to promote the safety of the
traveling public.
(4) Law enforcement agencies may use traffic control signal monitoring systems as
defined in Section 1 of this Act to enforce civil penalties for violation of
subsection (2) of this section.
Section 6. KRS 189.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.020 to 189.040,
subsection (1) or (4) of KRS 189.050, KRS 189.060 to 189.080, subsections (1) to
(3) of KRS 189.090, KRS 189.100, 189.110, 189.130 to 189.160, subsections (2) to
(4) of KRS 189.190, KRS 189.200, 189.285, subsection (1) or (2) of KRS 189.290,
189.300 to 189.360, KRS 189.380, KRS 189.400 to 189.430, KRS 189.450 to
189.458, KRS 189.4595 to 189.480, subsection (1) of KRS 189.520, KRS 189.540,
KRS 189.570 to 189.590, except subsection (1)(b) or (6)(b) of KRS 189.580, KRS
189.345, subsection (6) of KRS 189.456, and 189.960 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) of KRS 189.580 shall be fined not less
than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or
imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, unless the
accident involved death or serious physical injury and the person knew or should
have known of the death or serious physical injury, in which case the person shall
be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who violates paragraph (c) of subsection
(5) of KRS 189.390 shall be fined not less than eleven dollars ($11) nor more than
thirty dollars ($30). Neither court costs nor fees shall be taxed against any person
violating paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of KRS 189.390.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, any person
who violates the weight provisions of KRS 189.212, 189.221, 189.222,
189.226, 189.230, 189.270, or 189.2713 shall be fined two cents ($0.02)
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
per pound for each pound of excess load when the excess is five
thousand (5,000) pounds or less. When the excess exceeds five thousand
(5,000) pounds the fine shall be two cents ($0.02) per pound for each
pound of excess load, but the fine levied shall not be less than one
hundred dollars ($100) and shall not be more than five hundred dollars
($500).
2. Any person who violates a posted bridge weight limit on a state-
maintained bridge that is more than seventy-five (75) years old shall be
fined:
a. Five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense;
b. One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second offense within a one
(1) year period; and
c. Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for any subsequent offense within a
one (1) year period.
The Transportation Cabinet shall erect signs warning drivers of the
increased fines in this subparagraph. Signs erected under this
subparagraph shall be placed in such a manner that drivers are given
adequate warning in order to exit the road prior to crossing the bridge. If
warning signs are not erected in accordance with this subparagraph, the
fines in this subparagraph shall not apply and violators shall be fined
under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(b) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.271 and is operating on a
route designated on the permit shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100);
otherwise, the penalties in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply.
(c) Any person who violates any provision of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS
189.050, subsection (4) of KRS 189.090, KRS 189.221 to 189.230, 189.270,
189.2713, 189.280, or the dimension provisions of KRS 189.212, for which
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
another penalty is not specifically provided shall be fined not less than ten
dollars ($10) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(d) 1. Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 177.985 while operating
on a route designated in KRS 177.986 shall be fined one hundred dollars
($100).
2. Any person who operates a vehicle with a permit under KRS 177.985 in
excess of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds while operating on a route
not designated in KRS 177.986 shall be fined one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(e) Nothing in this subsection or in KRS 189.221 to 189.228 shall be deemed to
prejudice or affect the authority of the Department of Vehicle Regulation to
suspend or revoke certificates of common carriers, permits of contract
carriers, or drivers' or chauffeurs' licenses, for any violation of KRS 189.221
to 189.228 or any other act applicable to motor vehicles, as provided by law.
(3) (a) Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS 189.190 shall be fined not
more than fifteen dollars ($15).
(b) Any person who violates subsection (5) of KRS 189.190 shall be fined not
less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).
(4) (a) Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS 189.210 shall be fined not
less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(b) Any peace officer who fails, when properly informed, to enforce KRS
189.210 shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than
one hundred dollars ($100).
(c) All fines collected under this subsection, after payment of commissions to
officers entitled thereto, shall go to the county road fund if the offense is
committed in the county, or to the city street fund if committed in the city.
(5) Any person who violates KRS 189.370 shall for the first offense be fined not less
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or
imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, or both. For
each subsequent offense occurring within three (3) years, the person shall be fined
not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) or imprisoned not less than sixty (60) days nor more than six (6) months, or
both. The minimum fine for this violation shall not be subject to suspension. A
minimum of six (6) points shall be assessed against the driving record of any person
convicted.
(6) Any person who violates KRS 189.500 shall be fined not more than fifteen dollars
($15) in excess of the cost of the repair of the road.
(7) Any person who violates KRS 189.510 or KRS 189.515 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).
(8) Any peace officer who violates subsection (2) of KRS 189.520 shall be fined not
less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(9) (a) Any person who violates KRS 189.530(1) shall be fined not less than thirty-
five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned
not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months, or both.
(b) Any person who violates KRS 189.530(2) shall be fined not less than thirty-
five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(10) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.550 shall be guilty of a
Class B misdemeanor.
(11) Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS 189.560 shall be fined not less than
thirty dollars ($30) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(12) The fines imposed by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and subsections (6) and (7) of
this section shall, in the case of a public highway, be paid into the county road fund,
and, in the case of a privately owned road or bridge, be paid to the owner. These
fines shall not bar an action for damages for breach of contract.
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
(13) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.120 shall be fined not
less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each
offense.
(14) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.575 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).
(15) Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS 189.231 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. A
civil penalty may be levied in accordance with Sections 1 to 4 of this Act on a
person who violates subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act.
(16) Any person who violates restrictions or regulations established by the secretary of
transportation pursuant to subsection (3) of KRS 189.231 shall, upon first offense,
be fined one hundred dollars ($100) and, upon subsequent convictions, be fined not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or
imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.
(17) (a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.565 shall be guilty
of a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) In addition to the penalties prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, in
case of violation by any person in whose name the vehicle used in the
transportation of inflammable liquids or explosives is licensed, the person
shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five
hundred dollars ($500). Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(18) Any person who abandons a vehicle upon the right-of-way of a state highway for
three (3) consecutive days shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor
more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days
nor more than thirty (30) days.
(19) Every person violating KRS 189.393 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor,
unless the offense is being committed by a defendant fleeing the commission of a
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
felony offense which the defendant was also charged with violating and was
subsequently convicted of that felony, in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor.
(20) Any law enforcement agency which fails or refuses to forward the reports required
by KRS 189.635 shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS 17.157.
(21) A person who operates a bicycle in violation of the administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 189.287 shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10)
nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(22) Any person who violates KRS 189.860 shall be fined not more than five hundred
dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.
(23) Any person who violates KRS 189.754 shall be fined not less than twenty-five
dollars ($25) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300).
(24) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(3)(a) shall be fined fifty
dollars ($50). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this
subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional
court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765,
or any other additional fees or costs.
(25) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(3)(b) shall not be issued a
uniform citation, but shall instead receive a courtesy warning up until July 1, 2009.
For a violation on or after July 1, 2009, the person shall be fined thirty dollars
($30). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this
subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional
court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, a fee imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765, or
any other additional fees or costs. A person who has not been previously charged
with a violation of KRS 189.125(3)(b) may elect to acquire a booster seat meeting
the requirements of KRS 189.125. Upon presentation of sufficient proof of the
acquisition, the charge shall be dismissed and no fees or costs shall be imposed.
(26) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(6) shall be fined an
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25). This fine shall be subject to
prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs
pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee
imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765, or any other additional fees or costs.
(27) Fines levied pursuant to this chapter shall be assessed in the manner required by
KRS 534.020, in amounts consistent with this chapter. Nonpayment of fines shall
be governed by KRS 534.020 and 534.060.
(28) A licensed driver under the age of eighteen (18) charged with a moving violation
pursuant to this chapter as the driver of a motor vehicle may be referred, prior to
trial, by the court to a diversionary program. The diversionary program under this
subsection shall consist of one (1) or both of the following:
(a) Execution of a diversion agreement which prohibits the driver from operating
a vehicle for a period not to exceed forty-five (45) days and which allows the
court to retain the driver's operator's license during this period; and
(b) Attendance at a driver improvement clinic established pursuant to KRS
186.574. If the person completes the terms of this diversionary program
satisfactorily the violation shall be dismissed.
(29) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS 189.459 shall
be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The fines and costs for a violation of
subsection (2) or (3) of KRS 189.459 shall be collected and disposed of in
accordance with KRS 24A.180. Once deposited into the State Treasury, ninety
percent (90%) of the fine collected under this subsection shall immediately be
forwarded to the personal care assistance program under KRS 205.900 to 205.920.
Ten percent (10%) of the fine collected under this subsection shall annually be
returned to the county where the violation occurred and distributed equally to all
law enforcement agencies within the county.
(30) Any person who violates KRS 189.292 or 189.294 shall be fined twenty-five dollars
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 435
($25) for the first offense and fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.
(31) Any person who violates KRS 189.281(5) or (7)(b) shall be subject to a fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine
imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS
24A.175, additional costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee imposed pursuant to
KRS 24A.1765, or any other additional fees or costs.
(32) Any person who violates subsection (3) or (4) of KRS 189.290 and causes physical
injury to a person shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500).
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:01 PM Jacketed